North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 3. Limited Partners.

§ 59-301.
Admission of limited partners.

In connection with the formation of a limited partnership, a person is admitted as a limited partner upon the later to occur of:

The formation of the limited partnership; or

The time provided for becoming a limited partner pursuant to and upon compliance with the partnership agreement.

After the formation of a limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner:

In the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, at the time provided pursuant to, and upon the compliance with, the partnership agreement; and

In the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who has the power, as provided in

G.S. 59-704

, to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, upon the exercise of that power and compliance with any conditions limiting the grant or exercise of the power.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 16.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-302.
Voting.

The partnership agreement may grant to all or a specified group of the limited partners the right to vote (on a per capita or other basis) upon any matter.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 17.

§ 59-303.
Liability to third parties.

A limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership by reason of being a limited partner and does not become liable for the obligations of a limited partnership by participating in the management or control of the business of the limited partnership.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-362, s. 18.

§ 59-304.
Person erroneously believing himself limited partner.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a person who makes a contribution to a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not a general partner in the enterprise and is not bound by its obligations by reason of making the contribution, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, he:

Causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership [or] certificate of amendment to be executed and filed; or

Withdraws from future equity participation in the enterprise.

A person who makes a contribution of the kind described in subsection (a) of this section is liable as a general partner to any third party who transacts business with the enterprise in the case in which:

The third party actually believed in good faith that the person was a general partner at the time of the transaction; and

The third party transacted business with the enterprise before either:

An appropriate certificate has been filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to reflect that the person is not a general partner; or

The person has given notice to the partnership of withdrawal from future equity participation and before the withdrawal was effective.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 19.

§ 59-305.
Information.

Each limited partner has the right to:

Inspect and copy any of the partnership records required to be maintained by

G.S. 59-106

; and

Obtain from the general partners from time to time upon reasonable demand (i) true and full information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership, (ii) promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited partnership’s federal, State, and local income tax returns for each year, and (iii) other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 20.

§§ 59-306 through 59-400.

Reserved for future codification purposes.